Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2481.
Establishment; change of limits.

Upon application in writing of 20 or more freeholders or voters of a proposed fire district, the selectboard, after a duly warned public hearing, may establish such proposed fire district and define its limits. Such application shall contain a list of the powers mentioned in sections 2601 and 2603 of this title that the proposed district shall have and the district shall not have any of the other powers mentioned in these sections. Fire districts thus created shall be named by number in the order of their establishment. The selectboard shall file a certificate of its doings in the office of the town clerk for record. The selectboard may change the limits of a fire district upon a similar application and in like manner subject to the approval by the fire district at the annual or a special meeting of the fire district duly warned but any change in limits of a fire district may take place only with the consent of the majority of the landowners newly included within or excluded from those boundaries by that alteration. A record of any alteration of fire district boundaries shall be made by the town clerk. Only property contiguous to the fire district shall be the subject of an expansion of the boundaries of a fire district. For purposes of this subsection, a “public hearing” shall be a meeting of the legislative body of a town or of a fire district for the duly warned purpose of establishing or changing the limits of a fire district. Public notice for a public hearing required by this subsection shall be given not less than 15 days prior to the date of the public hearing by:

the publication of the date, place, and purpose of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality affected; and

the posting of the same information in one or more public places within the municipality.

If a petition signed by five percent of the legal voters of the town objecting to the proposed establishment or change of limits of the fire district is presented to the town clerk within 30 days of the date of posting and publication of the notice required by subsection (a) of this section, the selectboard shall cause the question of whether the town shall establish or change the limits of the fire district to be considered at a special or annual meeting called for that purpose. After the meeting, the fire district shall be established or the limits changed unless a majority of the voters of the town present and voting vote to disapprove of such establishment or change of limits. If a petition signed by five percent of the legal voters of a town objecting to a selectboard decision denying the establishment or the change of limits of a fire district is presented to the town clerk within 30 days of the selectboard decision, the selectboard shall cause the question of whether the town shall establish or change the limits of the fire district to be considered at a special or annual meeting called for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Amended 1993 No. 164 (Adj. Sess.) § 13;

2003, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2482.
Body corporate; first meeting.

The inhabitants of such district shall be a body corporate. The first meeting shall be called by the selectboard in the manner provided for warning fire district meetings.
The first selectman, or, in his or her absence, either of the others shall preside at such meeting.

§ 2483.
Annual and special meetings.

The annual fire district meeting shall be held on the second Monday in January, or at such other time as the district at any regular or special meeting may determine, and shall be warned by the clerk, or, in the clerk’s absence or neglect, by one of the prudential committee.
Special meetings shall be warned in the same manner on application in writing by three or more voters of the district, or by five percent of the voters of the district, whichever is greater.
A warning for a fire district meeting shall state the business to be transacted.
The time and place of holding the meeting shall be posted in two or more public places in the district not more than 40 days nor less than 30 days before the meeting and recorded in the office of the clerk before the same is posted.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 2484.
Voters.

Persons residing within the limits of a fire district who are voters in town meeting shall be voters in fire district meeting.

§ 2485.
Officers generally.

A fire district shall elect at its first meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter a clerk, a treasurer, and a collector of taxes. Such fire district may elect a chief engineer and such assistant engineers as are necessary, whether or not they are inhabitants of the district, who shall rank in the order of their election. Such officers shall hold office until the next annual meeting and until others are elected. A vacancy in any office may be filled by the prudential committee. Such district at its first meeting shall elect a prudential committee that shall consist of three persons, who shall serve for one, two, and three years, respectively. Thereafter at each annual meeting a member of such committee shall be elected for the term of three years. If the fire district so votes, two additional persons may be elected to such committee for a term of one year. A vacancy in such committee may be filled at an annual meeting, or at a special meeting called for that purpose, but the selectboard of the town in which such district is located may fill a vacancy in such committee until an election by the appointment of a resident of such district. When a meeting is not held on the second Monday in January, the officers of the district may be elected at a special meeting. The officers shall be elected by ballot if demanded by a voter and by a majority vote.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 77

, § 1.

§ 2486.
Collector.

A fire district may elect the collector of town taxes, although he or she is not an inhabitant of the district, to be collector of fire district taxes.
If he or she accepts the office, he or she shall have the powers and be subject to the duties imposed upon fire district collectors.

§ 2487.
Clerk.

The clerk shall keep a record of the meetings, votes, and proceedings of such district for the inspection of the inhabitants thereof.

§ 2488.
Board of tax abatement.

The board for the abatement of taxes of a fire district shall consist of the prudential committee, the clerk of the committee, the justices of the peace, and listers residing in the district. The board may abate taxes accruing to such municipality in all cases where a different provision is not made by the charter, acts of incorporation, or amendments to the charter or acts of incorporation of the municipality.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 165.

§ 2489.
Fire districts; two or more towns.

Where the limits of a proposed fire district include two or more towns, or portions of two or more towns, irrespective of whether the towns are situated in different counties, the application set forth in section 2481 of this title shall be made to the selectboard of each such town and the selectboard of each town as provided in section 2481 of this title may establish the proposed fire district and define its limits. The selectboard of each town shall file a certificate of their doings for record in the office of their respective town clerks and, if the proposed district extends into more than one county, in the office of the clerk of each such county. The selectboard may change the limits of the fire district upon a similar application subject to the approval of the fire district as provided in this chapter.

The first meeting of the fire district shall be called by the combined membership of the selectboards of the several towns in the manner provided for warning fire district meetings. The combined membership shall elect from its members a chair to preside at the first meeting. Where a vacancy in the prudential committee arises, the vacancy in the committee may be filled by the combined vote of the selectboard of each town. The fire district shall have all the same rights, duties, obligations, and responsibilities, and be governed by all of the provisions relating to fire districts located wholly within the limits of one town.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 62

, § 1, eff. April 14, 1971.